District of Columbia statutes.
16-5304

Validity of unsworn declaration.

(a)

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this section, if a law of the District of Columbia requires or permits use of a sworn declaration, an unsworn declaration meeting the requirements of this chapter shall have the same effect as a sworn declaration.

(b)

This chapter shall not apply to:

(1)

A deposition;

(2)

An oath of office;

(3)

An oath required to be given before a specified official other than a notary public; or

(4)

A declaration to be recorded with the Recorder of Deeds of the District of Columbia.

History

July 23, 2010, D.C. Law 18-191, § 2(b), 57 DCR 3400

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 4 of the Uniform Unsworn Foreign Declarations Act.